Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,113.07
Handicapped or disabled persons;
parking permit; prohibited acts; violation; penalty; powers of director.

(1) No person shall knowingly
provide false information on an application for a handicapped or disabled
parking permit. Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of
a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) If the director discovers
evidence of fraud in an application for a handicapped or disabled parking
permit or a license plate issued under section 60-3,113, the director may
summarily cancel such permit or license plate and send notice of cancellation
to the applicant.

Laws 2011, LB163, § 29;

Laws 2014, LB657, § 11.